California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The department shall also incorporate nonmotorized transportation facilities in the design of freeways on the state highway system along corridors where nonmotorized facilities do not exist, upon a finding that the facilities would conform to the California Recreational Trails System Plan specified in Section 5070.7 of the Public Resources Code or upon a finding, following a public hearing, that the facilities would conform to the master plans of local agencies for the development of nonmotorized facilities and would not duplicate existing or proposed routes, and that community interests would be enhanced by the construction of the facilities.

The department shall establish an annual priority list of projects to be funded pursuant to this section, which shall primarily benefit bicyclists rather than other highway users.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

888.4.

Each annual budget prepared pursuant to Section 165 shall include an amount of not less than three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000) for the construction of nonmotorized transportation facilities to be used in conjunction with the state highway system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

888.8.

The department may enter into any agreements, execute any documents, establish and manage any accounts or deposits, or take any other action that may be appropriate to receive and expend funds from the federal government in connection with state or local agency bicycle programs and nonmotorized transportation projects for which federal funds are available. The department may undertake demonstration projects and perform technical studies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. California Bicycle Routes of National, State, or Regional Significance [889. - 889.2.]

889.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the California Bicycle Routes of National, State, or Regional Significance Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 396, Sec. 2.   (AB 1464)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

889.1.

(a) The department may establish a process for identifying and promoting bicycle routes of national, state, or regional significance that meet specified criteria. 

(b) In designating routes, the department may consider the following: 

(1) Historic routes. 

(2) Established training routes or other designated routes, including legs of the Tour of California. 

(3) Routes of unique scenic significance. 

(c) In identifying bicycle routes of national, state, or regional significance, the
 department may work with the California Travel and Tourism Commission, the Department of Parks and Recreation, federal agencies that operate and maintain roadways for public use, statewide trade organizations, including the California Chamber of Commerce and the California Bicycle Coalition, local tourism entities, chambers of commerce, and local bicycle organizations. 

(d) The department may form an advisory committee to help implement the provisions of this section. The department may establish a process whereby organizations, including, but not limited to, local bicycle organizations, private entities, or local or state governmental entities may nominate a route for inclusion in the system of bicycle routes of national, state, or regional significance. 

(e) The department may develop criteria for the design, placement, and installation of signs relative to bicycle routes of
 national, state, or regional significance. 

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that city or county participation in establishing local routes of significance under this article shall be voluntary, similar to the State Scenic Highway Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 396, Sec. 2.   (AB 1464)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

889.2.

(a) The department may install bicycle route signs, identifying bicycle routes of national, state, or regional significance, that are associated only with the state highway system, which includes state highways, United States highways, and interstate freeways, and state-financed public transportation systems. The physical placement of bicycle route signs on all other roads and transit systems shall be left to the appropriate local jurisdiction. However, when requested by a city or county and reimbursed, the department shall place bicycle route signs on the state highway system and state-financed public transportation systems that direct traffic to bicycle routes on city or county roads. 

(b) Bicycle route signs shall meet the standards and
 specifications established pursuant to Section 21400 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) The cost to purchase, erect, and maintain bicycle route signs may be paid by applicants or nominating entities, as determined by the department. These costs may be reimbursed to the department at their actual cost, including administrative expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 396, Sec. 2.   (AB 1464)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California Bicycle Transportation Act [890. - 892.]

890.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this article, to establish a bicycle transportation system. It is the further intent of the Legislature that this transportation system shall be designed and developed to achieve the functional commuting needs of the employee, student, business person, and shopper as the foremost consideration in route selection, to have the physical safety of the bicyclist and bicyclist’s property as a major planning component, and to have the capacity to accommodate bicyclists of all ages and skills.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

890.2.

As used in this chapter, “bicycle” means a device upon which any person may ride, propelled exclusively by human power through a belt, chain, or gears, and having either two or three wheels in a tandem or tricycle arrangement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

890.3.

As used in this article, “bicycle commuter” means a person making a trip by bicycle primarily for transportation purposes, including, but not limited to, travel to work, school, shopping, or other destination that is a center of activity, and does not include a trip by bicycle primarily for physical exercise or recreation without such a destination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

890.4.

As used in this article, “bikeway” means all facilities that provide primarily for, and promote, bicycle travel. For purposes of this article, bikeways shall be categorized as follows:

(a) Bike paths or shared use paths, also referred to as “Class I bikeways,” which provide a completely separated right-of-way designated for the exclusive use of bicycles and pedestrians with crossflows by motorists minimized.

(b) Bike lanes, also referred to as “Class II bikeways,” which provide a restricted right-of-way designated for the exclusive or semiexclusive use of bicycles with through travel by motor vehicles or pedestrians prohibited, but with vehicle parking and crossflows by pedestrians
 and motorists permitted.

(c) Bike routes, also referred to as “Class III bikeways,” which provide a right-of-way on-street or off-street, designated by signs or permanent markings and shared with pedestrians and motorists.

(d) Cycle tracks or separated bikeways, also referred to as “Class IV bikeways,” which promote active transportation and provide a right-of-way designated exclusively for bicycle travel adjacent to a roadway and which are separated from vehicular traffic. Types of separation include, but are not limited to, grade separation, flexible posts, inflexible physical barriers, or on-street parking.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 17.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

890.6.

(a) The department, in cooperation with county and city governments, shall establish minimum safety design criteria for the planning and construction of each type of bikeway identified in Section 890.4 and roadways where bicycle travel is permitted.

(b) The criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the design speed of the facility, minimum widths
 and clearances, grade, radius of curvature, pavement surface, actuation of automatic traffic control devices, drainage, and general safety, with consideration for the safety of vulnerable populations, such as children, seniors, persons with impaired vision, and persons of limited mobility. The criteria shall be published by January 1, 2016, and updated biennially, or more often, as needed.

(c) The criteria shall be established in consultation with the existing advisory committee of the department dedicated to improving access for persons with disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 495, Sec. 4.   (AB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

890.8.

The department shall establish uniform specifications and symbols for signs, markers, and traffic control devices to designate bikeways, regulate traffic, improve safety and convenience for bicyclists, and alert pedestrians and motorists of the presence of bicyclists on bikeways and on roadways where bicycle travel is permitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

891.

(a) All city, county, regional, and other local agencies responsible for the development or operation of bikeways or roadways where bicycle travel is permitted shall utilize the minimum safety design criteria established pursuant to Section 890.6, except as provided in subdivision (b), and shall utilize the uniform specifications and symbols for signs, markers, and traffic control devices established pursuant to Section 890.8.

(b) An agency may utilize minimum safety design criteria other than those established by Section 890.6 if
 all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The alternative criteria have been reviewed and approved by a qualified engineer with consideration for the unique characteristics and features of the proposed bikeway and surrounding environs.

(2) The alternative criteria, or the description of the project with reference to the alternative criteria, are adopted by resolution at a public meeting, after having provided proper notice of the public meeting and opportunity for public comment.

(3) The alternative criteria adhere to guidelines established by a national association of public agency transportation officials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 495, Sec. 5.   (AB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

891.2.

A city or county may prepare a bicycle transportation plan, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following elements:

(a) The estimated number of existing bicycle commuters in the plan area and the estimated increase in the number of bicycle commuters resulting from implementation of the plan.

(b) A map and description of existing and proposed land use and settlement patterns which shall include, but not be limited to, locations of residential neighborhoods, schools, shopping centers, public buildings, and major employment centers.

(c) A map and description of existing and proposed bikeways.

(d) A map and description of existing and proposed end-of-trip bicycle parking facilities. These shall include, but not be limited to, parking at schools, shopping centers, public buildings, and major employment centers.

(e) A map and description of existing and proposed bicycle transport and parking facilities for connections with and use of other transportation modes. These shall include, but not be limited to, parking facilities at transit stops, rail and transit terminals, ferry docks and landings, park and ride lots, and provisions for transporting bicyclists and bicycles on transit or rail vehicles or ferry vessels.

(f) A map and description of existing and proposed facilities for changing and storing clothes and equipment. These shall include, but not be limited to, locker, restroom, and shower facilities near bicycle parking facilities.

(g) A description of bicycle safety and education programs conducted in the area included within the plan, efforts by the law enforcement agency having primary traffic law enforcement responsibility in the area to enforce provisions of the Vehicle Code pertaining to bicycle operation, and the resulting effect on accidents involving bicyclists.

(h) A description of the extent of citizen and community involvement in development of the plan, including, but not limited to, letters of support.

(i) A description of how the bicycle transportation plan has been coordinated and is consistent with other local or regional transportation, air quality, or energy conservation plans, including, but not limited to, programs that provide incentives for bicycle commuting.

(j) A description of the projects proposed in the plan and a listing of their priorities for implementation.

(k) A description of past expenditures for bicycle facilities and future financial needs for projects that improve safety and convenience for bicycle commuters in the plan area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

891.4.

(a) A city or county that has prepared a bicycle transportation plan pursuant to Section 891.2 may submit the plan to the county transportation commission or transportation planning agency for approval. The city or county may submit an approved plan to the department in connection with an application for funds for bikeways and related facilities which will implement the plan. If the bicycle transportation plan is prepared, and the facilities are proposed to be constructed, by a local agency other than a city or county, the city or county may submit the plan for approval and apply for funds on behalf of that local agency.

(b) The department may grant funds applied for pursuant to subdivision (a) on a matching basis which provides for the applicant’s furnishing of funding for 10 percent of the total cost of constructing the proposed bikeways and related facilities. The funds may be used, where feasible, to apply for and match federal grants or loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

891.5.

The Sacramento Area Council of Governments, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2551, may purchase, operate, and maintain callboxes on class 1 bikeways.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 262, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

891.8.

The governing body of a city, county, or local agency may do all of the following:

(a) Establish bikeways.

(b) Acquire, by gift, purchase, or condemnation, land, real property, easements, or rights-of-way to establish bikeways.

(c) Establish bikeways pursuant to Section 21207 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

891.9.

(a) On and after January 1, 2025, an agency responsible for the development or operation of bikeways or highways where bicycle travel is permitted shall not install a new sharrow on a highway that has a posted speed limit greater than 30 miles per hour, except at or near an intersection for the purpose of connecting a Class I, Class II, or Class IV bikeway through the intersection.

(b) For purposes of this section,
 “sharrow” means the marking in Figure 9C-9 of the 2014 California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, Revision 8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 788, Sec. 1.   (SB 1216)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

892.

(a) Rights-of-way established for other purposes by cities, counties, or local agencies shall not be abandoned unless the governing body determines that the rights-of-way or parts thereof are not useful as a nonmotorized transportation facility.

(b) No state highway right-of-way shall be abandoned until the department first consults with the local agencies having jurisdiction over the areas concerned to determine whether the right-of-way or part thereof could be developed as a nonmotorized transportation facility. If an affirmative determination is made, before abandoning the right-of-way, the department shall first make the property available to local agencies for development as nonmotorized transportation facilities in accordance with Sections 104.15 and 887.6 of this code and Section 14012 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Electric Bicycle Safety and Training [893. - 894.]

893.

As used in this article, “electric bicycle” has the meaning provided in Section 312.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 147, Sec. 1.   (AB 1946)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

894.

(a) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall develop, on or before September 1, 2023, statewide safety and training programs based on evidence-based practices for users of electric bicycles, including, but not limited to, general electric bicycle riding safety, emergency maneuver skills, rules of the road, and laws pertaining to electric bicycles.

(b) The safety and training programs shall be developed in collaboration with relevant stakeholders.

(c) The safety and training programs shall be posted on the internet website of the Department of the California Highway Patrol on or before September 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 213.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Scenic Areas [895. - 897.]

895.

If federal funds are available for reimbursement therefor, the department may acquire, either in fee or in any lesser estate or interest, real property adjacent to any highway included in the national system of interstate and defense highways or the federal-aid primary highway system, which the department considers necessary for the preservation, maintenance or conservation of scenic lands or areas adjacent to such highways or which it considers necessary to preserve, improve or enhance the scenic beauty of or points of interest in the lands or areas traversed by such highways. Nothing in this section shall authorize the use of eminent domain to acquire any dwelling or any building or other enclosure, and the appurtenances thereto, in which commercial activities are conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 125.)
-------------------------------------------

896.

The Legislature hereby declares that the acquisition of interests in real property for the preservation, maintenance or conservation of scenic lands or areas adjacent to any highway included in the national system of interstate and defense highways or the federal-aid primary highway system or to preserve, improve or enhance the natural beauty of points of interest in the lands or areas traversed by such highways provided for in Section 895 constitutes a public use and purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 125.)
-------------------------------------------

897.

The department may convey or lease such property back to its original owner or to another person or entity in the manner and subject to such reservations, conditions, covenants or other contractual arrangements approved by the commission as will preserve the scenic character or beauty of the area traversed by the highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 125.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2. COUNTY HIGHWAYS [900. - 1757.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [900. - 909.]

900.

The authority conferred upon boards of supervisors by this division shall be exercised subject to such limitations and restrictions as are prescribed by this division or by other provisions of law, shall be in addition to any authority elsewhere conferred, and, except as otherwise expressly provided, shall be exercised only in relation to highways within their respective counties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

901.

All county highways, once established, shall continue to be county highways until abandoned by order of the board of supervisors of the county in which such highways are situated, by operation of law, or by judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction. No county highway laid out by the board of supervisors as provided in this division, or used and worked as provided in this division, shall be abandoned or cease to be a county highway except as prescribed in this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

902.

Except as otherwise provided by law, any toll trail, toll road or toll bridge, for which the franchise has expired by limitation or nonuser, becomes a free county highway. No claim shall be valid against the county for the right of way, or for the land or material comprising such toll trail, toll road or toll bridge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

903.

After one year from the making of an order by a board of supervisors, pursuant to this division, opening a highway over any land, the county acquires title to the land in accordance with the terms of the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1788.)
-------------------------------------------

904.

No route of travel used by one or more persons over another’s land shall become a county highway by use.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

906.

The width of all county highways, other than bridges, alleys, lanes, and trails, shall be at least 40 feet, except as provided by Sections 906.5 and 969 and except that the board of supervisors of any county may, by a resolution passed by a unanimous vote of its members, determine that the public convenience and necessity demand the maintenance of a highway of less than 40 feet and may after such determination proceed with the maintenance of any such highway.

This section shall not increase or diminish the width of any county highway established, dedicated, and maintained as such prior to January 1, 1945.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

906.5.

On construction under a contract advertised for bids after July 1, 1973, the board of supervisors shall install on the surface of county highways upon which the operation of bicycles is permitted only those types of grates which are not hazardous to bicycle riders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1272.)
-------------------------------------------

906.6.

Notwithstanding Section 906, a county may maintain a highway of less than 40 feet in width if all the cost of maintenance thereof is paid for by a maintenance district created pursuant to Chapter 26 (commencing with Section 5820) of Part 3 of Division 1.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 906.5 (as added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 68) by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

907.

Any owner or occupant of land may construct a sidewalk on the county highway along the line of his land, subject to the authority conferred by law on the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

908.

The road commissioner, or the person to whom the duties of the road commissioner have been transferred pursuant to Section 2006.1 or 2006.5, shall maintain a record of each county highway, including its name and a general reference to its terminal points.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

909.

No agreement entered into by the board of supervisors for the purchase, hire, or rental of any apparatus used in the construction, improvement, or maintenance of highways shall create a charge against the county, unless the agreement complies with all of the following:

(a) The agreement is in writing.

(b) The writing is signed by the chair of the board of supervisors.

(c) A copy of the writing is certified by and filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors.

All of these writings and copies are public documents.

If a county purchases, hires, or rents any apparatus specified herein pursuant to a local purchasing ordinance, including competitive bidding procedures, it does not have to comply with subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) herein to create a charge against the county. Compliance with the local purchasing ordinance shall be sufficient to create a charge against the county for said purchase, hire, or rental.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 121.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Powers and Duties of Boards of Supervisors [940. - 991.]

940.

Boards of supervisors shall have general supervision, management, and control of the county highways.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

941.

(a) Boards of supervisors shall, by proper order, cause those highways which are necessary to public convenience to be established, recorded, constructed, and maintained in the manner provided in this division.

(b) No public or private road shall become a county highway until and unless the board of supervisors, or its designee, by appropriate action, has caused the road to be accepted into the county road system. No county shall be held liable for failure to maintain any road unless and until it has been accepted into the county road system by action of the board of supervisors or its designee.

(c) The acceptance of any road or the acceptance of any road subject to improvements pursuant to Section 66477.1 of the Government Code does not constitute the acceptance of the road into the county road system in the absence of the adoption of a resolution by the board of supervisors accepting the road into the county road system.

(d) In lieu of the procedures set forth in subdivisions (b) or (c), boards of supervisors may, by ordinance, designate a county officer to accept, on behalf of the board, roads or portions thereof, into the county road system and to record conveyances to the county of real property interests for road uses and purposes. The designee shall, prior to recording any conveyance under this section, affix a certificate to the instrument stating the acceptance into the county road system and designating the name or number, or both, of the county road. The designee shall report all acceptances and recordings to the board at the end of the fiscal year, or at more frequent intervals as determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

941.1.

The board of supervisors may lay out, acquire, construct, and maintain any section or portion of any street or highway within the county as a freeway or expressway and may make any existing street or highway a freeway or expressway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 367, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

941.2.

Boards of supervisors may close any street or highway within their jurisdiction at or near the point of its intersection with any freeway, or may make provision for carrying such street or highway over, under, or to a connection with the freeway, and may do any and all work on such street or highway as is necessary therefor.

No public highway shall be converted into a freeway except with the consent of the owners of abutting lands or the purchase or condemnation of their right of access thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

941.3.

Before taking any action authorized by Section 941.2 affecting any state highway, such action must be approved by the Department of Public Works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

941.4.

(a) The board of supervisors, with the consent of any city in which the proposed system is located, in whole or in part, may designate a system of expressways within the county. The designation shall be based on a study of the transportation needs of the county, which shall include a financing plan for the expressway system.

(b) The purpose of the county expressway system is to provide a level of service that is greater than that of city streets and county roads, but less than that provided by the state system of freeways. The designated county expressway system shall serve both incorporated and unincorporated areas of a county, as appropriate.

(c) The board of supervisors may enter into an agreement with the city council or other governing body of a city to close any city street at or near its intersection with an expressway or to provide for carrying the street over, under, or to a connection with the expressway, and to perform any work necessary for this purpose. No city street may be closed by the construction of an expressway except pursuant to such an agreement. No city street may be connected with an expressway unless the board of supervisors, by resolution, consents and specifies the terms and conditions of that connection. The board of supervisors may permit or prohibit, or specify the terms and conditions of, a connection as, in its opinion, will best serve the public interest of the county. This subdivision does not apply to any connection constructed prior to January 1, 1989.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the designated county expressway system may be planned, designed, acquired, constructed, reconstructed, rehabilitated, maintained, operated, and owned by the county in both incorporated and unincorporated areas.

(e) The board of supervisors may delegate any authority under this section to any local agency which it finds and determines has the capability to plan, design, acquire, construct, reconstruct, rehabilitate, maintain, operate, and own an expressway.

(f) The boards of supervisors of two or more adjacent counties into which an expressway is proposed to extend may enter into an agreement to plan, design, acquire, construct, reconstruct, rehabilitate, maintain, operate, or own the expressway. The agreement shall provide for the creation of a governing body with representation from each county.

(g) Any county having an existing expressway system which was designated by the board of supervisors before January 1, 1989, shall be deemed to have met the conditions of this section. Any new expressway project within such a system is subject to this section.

(h) As used in this section, “expressway” means a highway having partial or complete control of access, whether or not divided or with separations of grade at intersections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 367, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

941.6.

If the boundary line between two adjacent counties lies within a county highway, the boards of supervisors of the affected counties may, by agreement, provide for the improvement, maintenance, construction, or reconstruction of all or part of the highway by either or both counties, and each county may expend funds available to it for the improvements and maintenance of county highways as necessary for its performance of the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 766, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

942.

Such boards may enact and enforce ordinances and regulations for the construction, improvement or maintenance of county highways, and for the protection, supervision, management, control, or use of such highways. Any such board may by a four-fifths vote of all its members let county equipment used in the maintenance and construction of county roads, when such equipment is not in use upon the roads under the jurisdiction of the board, and may charge for the use thereof a rental, and arrange the basis of compensation, in keeping with the general conditions prevailing in the county in which the transaction is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 770.)
-------------------------------------------

942.5.

The board of supervisors may restrict the use of, or close, any county highway whenever the board considers such closing or restriction of use necessary:

(a) For the protection of the public.

(b) For the protection of such county highway from damage during storms.

(c) During construction, improvement or maintenance operations thereon.

No liability shall attach to the county, or to the board of supervisors, for the restriction of use, or closing, of any county highway for the above public purposes.

This section does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the pre-existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1876.)
-------------------------------------------

942.6.

The board of supervisors may delegate the powers contained in Section 942.5 to the county road commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 488.)
-------------------------------------------

943.

Such board may:

(a) Acquire any property necessary for the uses and purposes of county highways. When eminent domain proceedings are necessary, the board shall require the district attorney to institute such proceedings. The expense of and award in such proceedings may be paid from the road fund or the general fund of the county, or the road fund of any district benefited.

(b) Lay out, construct, improve, and maintain county highways.

(c) Incur a bonded indebtedness for any of such purposes, subject to the provisions of Section 944.

(d) Construct and maintain stock trails approximately paralleling any county highway, retain and maintain for stock trails the right-of-way of any county highway which is superseded by relocation. Such stock trail shall not be included in the term “maintained mileage of county roads” as that term is used in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 3 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

944.

No bonded indebtedness shall be incurred for any purpose specified in section 943 until after the question of the issue of bonds therefor has been submitted to the qualified electors of the county, at the next general election or at a special election called for that purpose, and two-thirds of the electors of the county voting at such election have voted in favor of issuing such bonds. The election shall be called and held and the bonds, if authorized, shall be issued, sold, and made payable as prescribed by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

945.

Such boards may expend from the county general fund the moneys necessary to pay the whole or any part of the cost of the improvement of any highway lying within any city in the county, whenever any real property belonging to the county and used for public purposes is included within the assessment district formed to pay for any such improvement. Such expenditures shall not exceed the amount which, but for such public ownership and use, would be properly chargeable to and assessed against such real property under the provisions of the law governing such improvement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

946.

No liability shall be created against the county in connection with any such improvement conducted by a city unless the board, by resolution, determines and declares the amount to be expended and directs that such sum be set apart and reserved out of any moneys available for such purpose in the general fund of the county, to be used exclusively for paying the expense of such improvement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

947.

Every instrument or judgment which constitutes evidence of title to a right of way, or incident thereto, in relation to county highways shall particularly describe the lands included in such right of way or incident.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

948.

The board of supervisors of each county shall cause to be recorded with the county recorder, in relation to every county highway within the county, proper evidences of title to every right-of-way, and all incidents thereto. The board of supervisors may, by ordinance, delegate this duty to a county officer or employee.

In cases of acquisitions by conveyance or condemnation, the property or incidents conveyed or condemned shall be particularly described in the instruments recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 132, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

949.

The board of supervisors may plant shade and ornamental trees on the county highways, and provide for their care. The cost of planting and caring for such trees may be paid from the county general fund.

The board may also encourage, under such regulations as it adopts, the planting and preservation of shade and ornamental trees on the county highways, and may pay a sum not exceeding one dollar to any person planting and cultivating a living tree, payment to be made when the tree is four years of age.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

950.

For the purpose of sprinkling county highways with oil or water, the board of supervisors may erect or maintain waterworks, tanks or reservoirs, and may purchase or lease real or personal property therefor.

The board may charge the cost of erecting or maintaining such waterworks, tanks or reservoirs and of such sprinkling to the county general fund, the road fund, or the district fund of any district benefited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 801.)
-------------------------------------------

951.

(a) Such board may set apart on any county highway a strip of land for a side path, and make an order designating the width of such path, and cause the lines separating the path from the highway to be located and marked by stakes, posts, curbs, dikes, trees, or other physical delineations, placed at such distances apart as the board considers proper.

(b) After a path is set apart, and the lines separating it from the highway are located and marked, as provided in subdivision (a) of this section, the use of such path is restricted to pedestrians, riders of horses, and riders of vehicles propelled solely by the power of the rider.

(c) The board may charge the expense of erecting and maintaining such path to the county general fund, the road fund, or the district fund of any district benefited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

952.

Such board shall cause properly inscribed guideposts to be erected and maintained at all county highway crossings and forks lying outside of any city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

953.
